Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3650.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [325F.7845] PHARMACEUTICAL ADVERTISING. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For the purposes of this section, the terms defined in this subdivision have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Prescription drug" has the meaning provided in section 151.441, subdivision 8, except that prescription drug only includes drugs covered by the medical assistance program, MinnesotaCare program, or state employees group insurance program. new text end new text begin (c) "Television advertisement" means a form of paid marketing communication designed to promote products, services, or brands through an over-the-air broadcast or an internet-based, nonbroadcast stream of an over-the-air broadcast. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Prohibition. new text end new text begin Television advertisements for the sale of prescription drugs to consumers are prohibited. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Enforcement. new text end new text begin The attorney general may enforce this section under section 8.31. new text end